Illinois, session 104th, SB4100.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4ARTICLE 15    Section 5. The sum of $16,657,700, or so much thereof as 6may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 7Fund to the Department of Human Rights for operational 8expenses of the Department. 9    Section 10. The sum of $50,000, or so much thereof as may 10be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue Fund to 11the Department of Human Rights for costs associated with the 12Commission on Discrimination and Hate Crimes. 13    Section 15. The sum of $100,000, or so much thereof as may 14be necessary, is appropriated from the Department of Human 15Rights Training and Development Fund to the Department of 16Human Rights for the purpose of funding expenses associated 17with administration. 18    Section 20. The sum of $4,794,800, or so much thereof as 19may be necessary, is appropriated from the Special Projects 20Division Fund to the Department of Human Rights for   SB4100- 2 -OMB104 00187 TGT 10187 b1operational expenses of the Department. 2    Section 25. The sum of $500,000, or so much thereof as may 3be necessary, is appropriated from the Department of Human 4Rights Special Fund to the Department of Human Rights for the 5purpose of filing expenses associated with the Department of 6Human Rights. 7    Section 30. The sum of $5,000,000, or so much thereof as 8may be necessary, is appropriated from the Hate Crimes and 9Bias Incident Prevention and Response Fund to the Department 10of Human Rights for grants and administrative expenses 11associated with the eradication of hate crimes and bias 12incidents.13ARTICLE 2 14    Section 5. The amount of $1,402,560, that was appropriated 15to the Department of Human Rights from the General Revenue 16Fund for the purpose of providing a grant to the Simon 17Wiesenthal Center's Midwest Region Office in Chicago to 18operate a mobile museum bus for tolerance in State Fiscal Year 192026 by Article 54, Section 45 of Public Act 104-0003, as 20amended, or so much thereof that remains unexpended at the 21close of business on June 30, 2026, is hereby appropriated 22from the Fund for Illinois' Future to the Department of Human 23Rights for purpose of providing a grant to the Simon 24Wiesenthal Center's Midwest Region Office in Chicago to   SB4100- 3 -OMB104 00187 TGT 10187 b1operate a mobile museum bus for tolerance. 2    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 32026.